Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,108
(UTC 1101) Uniformity of application and construction.

(UTC 1101) In applying and construing the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 108.